Hawaii statutes.
[§23G-5] Annual and other reports to be
submitted to legislature; tracking, monitoring, reporting, coordination.
The legislative reference bureau shall develop a system to track and monitor
the submission of reports to the legislature by executive agencies and the
judiciary. The system shall encompass all annual and other reports required by
law to be submitted to the legislature, or requested by legislative resolution.
[L 2001, c 231, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next